Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.065

Apiary coordinated areas—Hearing to establish.

When the county legislative authority determines that it would be desirable to establish an apiary coordinated area or areas in their county, they shall make an order fixing a time and place when a hearing will be held, notice of which shall be published at least once each week for two successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation within the county. It shall be the duty of the county legislative authority at the time fixed for such hearing, to hear all persons interested in the establishment of apiary coordinated areas as defined in this section and RCW 15.60.075 and 15.60.085.

[ 2011 c 103 s 5; 1993 c 89 s 18; 1989 c 354 s 65. Formerly RCW 15.60.180.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.